test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-amiskw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - amiskw - ok : # -m animate noun, beaver # quite unsure about the diminutives
     amisk+N+AN+Sg: amisk
     amisk+N+AN+Pl: amiskwak
     amisk+N+AN+Loc: amiskohk
     amisk+N+AN+Obv: amiska
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: amiskis 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: amiskisak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: amiskisihk
     
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitamiskominân
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitamiskominaw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitamiskominânak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitamiskominawak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâwak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nitamiskisim, nitamiskosisim] 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kitamiskisim, kitamiskosisim]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: [otamiskisima, otamiskosisima]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: [otamiskisimiyiwa, otamiskosisimiyiwa]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: [nitamiskisiminân, nitamiskosisiminân]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: [kitamiskisiminaw, kitamiskosisiminaw]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: [kitamiskisimiwâw, kitamiskosisimiwâw]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: [otamiskisimiwâwa, otamiskosisimiwâwa]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: [otamiskisimiyiwa, otamiskosisimiyiwa]
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: [nitamiskisimak, nitamiskosisimak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: [kitamiskisimak, kitamiskosisimak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: [otamiskisima, otamiskosisima]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: [otamiskisimiyiwa, otamiskosisimiyiwa]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: [nitamiskosisiminânak, nitamiskisiminânak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: [kitamiskosisiminawak, kitamiskisiminawak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: [kitamiskosisimiwâwak, kitamiskisimiwâwak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: [otamiskisimiwâwa, otamiskosisimiwâwa]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: [otamiskisimiyiwa, otamiskosisimiyiwa]
     
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otamiskomiyihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otamiskomiyihk

     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nitamiskosisimihk, nitamiskisimihk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: [kitamiskosisimihk, kitamiskisimihk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: [otamiskosisimihk, otamiskisimihk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: [otamiskosisimiyihk, otamiskisimiyihk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: [nitamiskosisiminâhk, nitamiskisiminâhk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: [kitamiskosisiminâhk, kitamiskisiminâhk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: [kitamiskosisimiwâhk, kitamiskisimiwâhk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: [otamiskosisimiwâhk, otamiskisimiwâhk]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: [otamiskosisimiyihk, otamiskisimiyihk]
     
